Utah statutes.
53A-15-1006.   Payment for an Electronic High School course.

(1)  Electronic High School courses are provided to students who are Utah residents, as defined in Section 53A-2-201, free of charge.

(2)  Nonresident students may enroll in Electronic High School courses for a fee set by the board, provided that the course can accommodate additional students.



Amended by Chapter 238, 2012 General Session

